Maine, session 132, LD1258.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §10126, sub-§1, ¶A-2 is enacted to read:
A-2. "Eligible electric vehicle provider" means:
(1) An authorized licensee of the original equipment manufacturer in the State or
an authorized licensee of the original equipment manufacturer located outside of
the State that meets all of the requirements applicable to in-state authorized
licensees of the original equipment manufacturer as determined by the trust;
(2) A licensed automobile dealer in the State or a licensed automobile dealer
located outside of the State that meets all of the requirements applicable to in-state
licensed automobile dealerships as determined by the trust; and
(3) The original equipment manufacturer, wherever located.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §10126, sub-§3, as corrected by RR 2023, c. 2, Pt. A, §56, is
amended to read:
3. Incentive Electric vehicle incentive program established; eligibility. In
accordance with the provisions of this section, the trust shall establish and administer a
program that provides incentives for the purchase or lease of electric vehicles. A person
may apply for and, as resources within the fund allow, receive an incentive for an electric
vehicle, subject to eligibility requirements established by the trust. Eligibility criteria for
the vehicle must include that the vehicle is a battery electric vehicle or a plug-in hybrid
electric vehicle; the vehicle is purchased, or leased for a term of 36 months or more, from
an authorized licensee of the original equipment manufacturer or a licensed automobile
dealer in the State or from its original equipment manufacturer, wherever located eligible
electric vehicle provider; and, to the extent required by Title 29‑A, chapter 5, the vehicle is
registered in the State. An automobile, as defined in Title 29‑A, section 101, subsection 7,
with a gross vehicle weight rating of 6,000 pounds or less is not eligible for the program if
it has a manufacturer's suggested retail price greater than $55,000. To the extent funds are
Page 1 - 132LR1919(03)

available, the trust may extend program eligibility to medium duty vehicles and heavy duty
vehicles that are battery electric vehicles or plug-in hybrid electric vehicles and to electric
bicycles in accordance with subsection 3-A. Eligibility requirements for the recipient of
the incentive must include that the recipient attests to a commitment to maintain a
registration in this State to the extent required by Title 29‑A, chapter 5, whether through
purchase or lease, of the eligible electric vehicle for at least 36 months from the date of
purchase or lease. The trust may require a recipient of an incentive under this section who
does not maintain a registration in this State of the eligible electric vehicle for at least 36
months to repay the trust up to the full amount of the incentive. If the trust extends program
eligibility to electric bicycles, the trust shall limit the electric bicycle incentives to
recipients who are low-income and moderate-income individuals and to entities that serve
those individuals, as determined by the trust. For a recipient to receive an incentive for the
purchase of an electric bicycle under the program, the electric bicycle must serve as the
recipient's principal means of commuting, as determined by the trust.
The trust shall establish the incentive amount for each eligible electric vehicle. The trust
shall establish incentive amounts that it determines most effectively increase the use of
eligible electric vehicles in the State to advance the State's carbon reduction targets and
reduce transportation-related energy costs. For each model of an eligible electric vehicle,
the trust may establish different incentive amounts based on the size of the vehicle battery.
The trust may establish different incentive amounts for the purpose of providing reasonable
opportunity for participation in the program across different customer groups and
geographic areas. The trust may establish reasonable limits on the number of incentives
per vehicle or per person.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §10126, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. Electric bicycle incentive; eligibility. If the trust extends the electric vehicle
incentive program eligibility under subsection 3 to electric bicycles, the trust shall establish
eligibility criteria that include the following.
A. An electric bicycle incentive recipient must be a low-income or moderate-income
individual or an entity that serves low-income or moderate-income individuals, as
determined by the trust.
B. The electric bicycle for which the recipient is receiving the incentive must serve as
the recipient's principal means of commuting, as determined by the trust.
C. The electric bicycle must be purchased, or leased for a term of 36 months or more,
from:
(1) An authorized licensee of the original equipment manufacturer in the State;
(2) An authorized licensee of the original equipment manufacturer located outside
of the State that meets all the requirements applicable to in-state authorized
licensees of the original equipment manufacturer, as determined by the the trust;
or
(3) The original equipment manufacturer, wherever located.
Page 2 - 132LR1919(03)